Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER

Cross references:

For fees of county clerk and recorders, see § 30-1-103.

30-10-401. County clerk - term - bond - insurance.

A county clerk shall be elected in each county of this state for the term of four years and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before entering upon the duties of the office, shall execute to the people of the state of Colorado, and file with the county clerk then in office, a bond with two or more sufficient sureties in the sum of not less than five thousand dollars, to be affixed and approved by the board of county commissioners according to law, with conditions in substance as follows: "Whereas, The above bounden ........ was elected to the office of the county clerk of ........, on the ........ day of ........, Now, therefore, if the said ........ shall faithfully perform all the duties of the office, and shall pay over all moneys that may come into the hands of the clerk as required by law, and shall deliver to the clerk's successor in office all the books, records, papers, and other things belonging to said office, then the above obligation to be void, otherwise to remain in full force." The bond, after being recorded, shall be at once deposited with the county treasurer for safekeeping.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars on behalf of the county clerk to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the clerk while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 478.

G.S.

§ 573.

R.S. 08:

§ 1256.

C.L.

§ 8731.

CSA:

C. 45, § 78.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-1.

L. 56:

p. 128, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 559, § 13, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the oath of civil officers, see § 8 of art. XII, Colo. Const.; for the election, term, and salary of county officers, see § 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.; for the election of county clerk, see § 1-4-206; for bonds executed by surety companies, see § 10-4-301; for the approval of official bonds, see § 24-13-116; for bonds of county officers, see § 30-10-110.

30-10-402. Clerk for board of commissioners.

The county clerk shall be, in and for his county, clerk of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

G.L.

§ 479.

G.S.

§ 574.

R.S. 08:

§ 1257.

C.L.

§ 8732.

CSA:

C. 45, § 79.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-2.

30-10-403. Deputy clerk - duties.

Every county clerk shall appoint a deputy, in writing, under the county clerk's hand, and shall file such appointment in the office of the county clerk; and such deputy, in case of the absence or disability of the county clerk, or in case of a vacancy in the office thereof, shall perform all the duties of the county clerk during such absence or until such vacancy is filled. Every county clerk may appoint other deputies and, if the county clerk has executed a bond pursuant to section 30-10-401 (1), the county clerk's sureties shall be responsible under the bond for the acts of all such deputies.

Source:

G.L.

§ 480.

G.S.

§ 575.

R.S. 08:

§ 1258.

C.L.

§ 8733.

CSA:

C. 45, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 560, § 14, effective August 11.

30-10-404. Vacancy in office - how filled.

If a vacancy in the office of county clerk should occur by death, resignation, or otherwise, the board of county commissioners shall appoint some suitable person to fill such vacancy until a successor is elected according to law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 481.

G.S.

§ 576.

R.S. 08:

§ 1259.

C.L.

§ 8734.

CSA:

C. 45, § 81.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-4.

30-10-405. Office at county seat - seal - records.

The county clerk and recorder shall keep his or her office at the county seat. The county clerk and recorder shall attend the sessions of the board of county commissioners either in person or by deputy, keep the county seal, records, and papers of the board of county commissioners, and keep a record of the proceedings of the board, as required by law, under the direction of the board of county commissioners. Records of such proceedings shall be kept in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the county clerk and recorder may maintain his or her office at a location other than the county seat when authorized to do so pursuant to part 1 of article 5 of title 13, C.R.S.

Source:

G.L.

§ 482.

G.S.

§ 577.

R.S. 08:

§ 1260.

C.L.

§ 8735.

CSA:

C. 45, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-5.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 92, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 561, § 5, effective August 5.

30-10-405.5. Electronic filings.

The county clerk and recorder may accept by electronic filing deeds and all other documents authorized by law to be recorded in his or her office. As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires, "electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. To the extent the provisions of this part 4 differ from the requirements of the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., the provisions of this part 4 are intended to modify, limit, or supercede the requirements of such act, as provided for in section 7002 (a) of such act.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 789, § 1, effective August 7.

30-10-406. County clerk and recorder - duties - filing requirements.

The county clerk shall be ex officio recorder of deeds and shall have custody of and safely keep and preserve all the documents received for recording or filing in his or her office. As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires, "document" includes electronic filings. During the hours the office is open for business, the clerk and recorder shall also record or cause to be recorded in print, or in a plain and distinct handwriting, or electronically, in suitable books or electronic records to be provided and kept in the clerk and recorder's office, all documents authorized by law to be recorded in his or her office and shall perform all other duties required by law.

Upon recording any document to which a documentary fee applies, the clerk and recorder shall forward a clear, complete, and accurate copy of such document to the office of the county assessor. The clerk and recorder may forward the copy electronically to said office.

All documents received for recording or filing in the clerk and recorder's office, except a verification of application form as defined in section 38-29-102 (13), C.R.S., shall contain a top margin of at least one inch and a left, right, and bottom margin of at least one-half of an inch. The clerk and recorder may refuse to record or file any document that does not conform to the requirements of this paragraph (a).

Repealed.

The county clerk and recorder shall perform the duties prescribed in article 22 of title 15, C.R.S., with respect to the recording and processing of designated beneficiary agreements and revocations of such agreements.

Source:

G.L.

§ 483.

G.S.

§ 578.

R.S. 08:

§ 1261.

C.L.

§ 8736.

CSA:

C. 45, § 83.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-6.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 753, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1557, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 215, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 789, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 62, § 1, effective July 1; (4) added, (HB 09-1260), ch. 107, p. 447, § 17, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3)(b), effective September 1, 1998. (See L. 97, p. 215.)

30-10-406.5. Redaction of first five digits of social security numbers on public documents.

A county clerk and recorder shall redact the first five digits of a social security number from a public document recorded with the clerk and recorder upon the request of the individual assigned the social security number or that individual's designee by power of attorney or appointment of personal representative, custodian, conservator, or guardian if:

The document is in electronic form;

The clerk and recorder has the equipment needed to automatically make the redaction; and

The individual requesting redaction makes the request in writing on a form provided by the clerk and pays a fee pursuant to section 30-1-103 (1).

A county clerk and recorder may, but is not required to, make a requested redaction even if he or she lacks the equipment needed to do so automatically.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1112), ch. 28, p. 171, § 1, effective January 1, 2015.

30-10-407. Microfilm and optical imaging records - when - standards for optical imaging systems.

When authorized by the board of county commissioners, the county clerk and recorder in counties, or cities and counties, may record the documents lawfully filed for record in his or her office by making and preserving microfilm or optical images thereof. Such county clerk and recorder shall properly index the same in the manner required by law. When the microfilm or optical imaging method of recording has been approved by the board of county commissioners and adopted by the county clerk and recorder, at least one microfilm reader to make the microfilms legible or at least one computer terminal to access optical imaging records shall be provided, and as many more microfilm readers or computer terminals as may prove necessary to give reasonable service to the public shall also be provided.

At least two microfilms or two optical imaging database records shall be made of each recorded document, which shall be kept in separate buildings as far as reasonably may be done in order that they may not be subject to the same hazards. All sets of the microfilm and all optical imaging computer data shall be constantly under the control of the county clerk and recorder. One set of microfilm or one copy of the optical imaging database shall always be kept by the county clerk and recorder, so that the same is available to the public during the hours that said county clerk and recorder's office is open for business and so that persons desiring to inspect or examine the record may do so by means of microfilm reader and facilities or by means of optical imaging computer terminals maintained in said county clerk and recorder's office. Said records shall not be removed from the county clerk and recorder's office at any time for any purpose, except the security copy, which shall be kept in a security vault approved by the board of county commissioners and the county clerk and recorder. The security copy of the microfilm or optical image media may be deposited in the county records section of the department of personnel.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 376, § 1, effective July 1, 2004.)

Any document which cannot be satisfactorily recorded by microfilm or by optical imaging may be recorded by other methods of photographing or by transcribing by typewriter or by longhand.

(4.3) Regardless of the method by which a document is recorded, legible size prints shall be made on demand for the fee provided by law; except that the county clerk and recorder shall not be required to provide a print during the first three business days after a document is recorded.

(4.5) Any optical imaging system utilized by a county clerk and recorder shall, at minimum, produce permanent records which do not permit additions, deletions, or other changes to the original documents.

Nothing in this section shall abridge or limit the power of any court to compel the production of any microfilm or optical imaging records in any proceeding.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 302, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 83(1).

L. 53:

p. 222, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-7.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1435, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 960, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1542, § 134, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended and (4.3) added, p. 376, § 1, effective July 1.

30-10-408. Grantor and grantee indices to be kept by county clerk and recorder.

Every county clerk and recorder shall keep a grantor index and a grantee index in the clerk and recorder's office. The grantor index may be divided into seven columns, with heads to the respective columns as follows:

The clerk and recorder shall make correct entries in the grantor index of every document filed or recorded, as required by law, concerning or affecting real estate, under the appropriate headings, entering the names of the grantors in alphabetical order.

The grantee index may be divided into seven columns, with heads to the respective columns as follows:

The clerk and recorder shall make correct entries in the grantee index of every document filed or recorded, as required by law, concerning or affecting real estate under the appropriate heading, entering the names of the grantees in alphabetical order.

(2.5) The county clerk and recorder shall properly enter a recorded document in the grantor and grantee indices as soon as practicable but not later than seven business days after the date on which the document is recorded.

In counties with the capability, the county clerk and recorder may substitute printouts, microfiches, aperture cards, or other legible photographic or electronic processes for the books and indices required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The security and public inspection provisions of section 30-10-407 shall apply to all such printouts, microfiches, aperture cards, or other photographic or electronic records. Both the grantor and grantee indices may be combined in one alphabetical listing with proper coding to indicate grantor and grantee, with both the grantor and grantee appearing in proper alphabetical order.

A general index of releases may be maintained on printouts, microfiches, or aperture cards, by other legible photographic or electronic process, or in a separate book of releases containing a space to enter new index numbers of releases on a numerical listing of the original recording information of the document being released.

Records kept under the provisions of this subsection (3) may substitute reception or index numbers for volume, film, or page numbers, and any electronic records may contain indices for as many years as the county clerk and recorder may deem useful for public inspection.

Time of
Names of
Names of
Type of
Reception
Grantors
Grantees
Document
Volume and
Description
Page Where
Remarks
of
Recorded
Tract

Time of
Names of
Names of
Type of
Reception
Grantors
Grantees
Document
Volume and
Description
Page Where
Remarks
of
Recorded
Tract

Source:

G.L.

§ 484.

G.S.

§ 579.

L. 1889:

p. 105, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1262.

C.L.

§ 8737.

CSA:

C. 45, § 84.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-8.

L. 81:

(2)(b) amended and (3) added, p. 1435, § 2, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 82:

(2)(b) amended, p. 625, § 30, effective April 2.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1557, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 790, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(2.5) added, p. 377, § 2, effective July 1.

30-10-409. Reception book - form - contents - acceptance for recording.

The county clerk and recorder shall also keep a reception book, each page of which shall be divided into five columns, with heads to the respective columns as follows:

When any document has been accepted by the clerk and recorder for recording and the proper fee has been paid, such document shall be deemed to be recorded for all purposes. After a document has been received, the clerk and recorder shall endorse upon such document information, which may be in electronic form, noting the day, hour, and minute of its acceptance for recording, the index or reception number, the volume, film or page where recorded, if such are used, and the fee received for recording the same and shall immediately make an entry of the same in the reception book, under the appropriate heading, with the amount paid as fee for recording the same. A document shall be deemed accepted as of the date and time of its endorsement. The clerk and recorder's endorsement may be done electronically. When such endorsement is made electronically, the endorsement shall be immediately perceptible and reproducible. Any document, except those filed and recorded pursuant to section 38-29-205, C.R.S., that is received by 1 p.m. on a business day shall be endorsed by the end of that day. Any document that is received after 1 p.m. on a business day shall be endorsed by 5 p.m. on the following business day. Those documents received pursuant to section 38-29-205, C.R.S., shall be endorsed by the clerk and recorder within three business days. After a document has been endorsed and processed for recording, the clerk and recorder, without additional fee or charge, shall deliver it by regular mail, electronic delivery, or personal delivery to the person authorized to receive the same, writing the name of the person to whom it is delivered in an appropriate column in the reception book.

In counties with the capability, the county clerk and recorder may substitute printouts, microfiches, aperture cards, or other legible photographic or electronic processes for the reception book required by this section; except that proper audit controls of cash receipts shall be maintained in compliance with governmental audit procedures.

No clerk and recorder shall be bound to perform any of the duties required to be performed for which a fee is required unless such fee has been paid or tendered.

A clerk and recorder who decides to accept electronic filings shall establish procedures for such electronic filings that are consistent with any standards or rules established by the electronic recording technology board pursuant to section 24-21-403, C.R.S. No electronic filings shall be accepted by the clerk and recorder until the clerk and recorder has established and made publically available the procedures for electronic filings. Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to require any clerk and recorder to accept electronic filings. Nothing in this article shall abridge the power of any clerk and recorder to accept or reject electronic filings in accordance with the provisions of section 38-35-202, C.R.S.

The deadlines set forth in sections 30-10-407 (4.3) and 30-10-408 (2.5) and subsection (2) of this section shall be extended for a reasonable period of time if an extenuating circumstance prevents the clerk and recorder from meeting such deadlines.

As used in this subsection (6), "extenuating circumstance" means a disaster, as defined in section 24-33.5-703 (3), C.R.S., or a technical difficulty related to computer hardware or software that is outside the control of the clerk and recorder.

No deadline shall be extended pursuant to this subsection (6), unless the clerk and recorder makes a written finding of extenuating circumstances that is available to the public. Such finding shall include the deadline that has been extended, the reason for the extension, and the period of the extension.

In the case of an extension related to a technical difficulty related to computer hardware or software, the period of extension shall not exceed seven days.

Time
Names
Names
To
of
of
of
Whom
Fees
Reception
Grantors
Grantees
Delivered
Received

Source:

G.L.

§ 485.

G.S.

§ 580.

R.S. 08:

§ 1263.

C.L.

§ 8738.

CSA:

C. 45, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-9.

L. 81:

(3) added, p. 1436, § 3, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1559, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) and (3) amended and (5) added, p. 790, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(2) amended and (6) added, p. 377, § 3, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1157, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 62, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(6) (b) amended, (HB13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1694, § 96, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(5) amended, (SB 16-115), ch. 356, p. 1481, § 4, effective June 10.

30-10-410. File of plats or maps - index - names.

The clerk and recorder shall maintain a file of all subdivision plats presented for recording in accordance with law and all common interest community plats or maps presented for recording in accordance with section 38-33.3-201, C.R.S. Subdivision plats shall be indexed in the grantor index under the name of the person that signs and acknowledges the plat as the owner and dedicator and in the grantee index under the name of the plat shown thereon. The clerk and recorder shall also keep an alphabetical index of such subdivision plats by the name of the plat. Common interest community plats or maps shall be indexed in the same manner as the declaration for such community, as provided in section 38-33.3-201, C.R.S.

Source:

G.L.

§ 486.

G.S.

§ 581.

R.S. 08:

§ 1264.

C.L.

§ 8739.

CSA:

C. 45, § 86.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-10.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1559, § 7, effective July 1.

30-10-411. Index of records - grantors - grantees. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 487.

G.S.

§ 582.

R.S. 08:

§ 1265.

C.L.

§ 8740.

CSA:

C. 45, § 87.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-11.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1560, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-412. Recording of papers in bankruptcy. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 39:

p. 236, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 87(1).

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-12.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1560, § 9, effective July 1.

30-10-413. Certified copies prima facie evidence.

Copies of all documents recorded or filed in the office of the clerk and recorder and transcripts from the records kept therein, certified by the clerk and recorder under the seal of his or her office, shall be prima facie evidence in all cases.

Source:

G.L.

§ 488.

G.S.

§ 583.

R.S. 08:

§ 1266.

C.L.

§ 8741.

CSA:

C. 45, § 88.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-13.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1560, § 10, effective July 1.

30-10-414. Abstract of deeds - contents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 50, § 1.

G.L.

§ 424.

G.S.

§ 584.

R.S. 08:

§ 1267.

C.L.

§ 8742.

CSA:

C. 45, § 89.

L. 51:

p. 301, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-14.

L. 59:

p. 345, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-14.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 513, § 4, effective May 16.

30-10-415. Tax sales excepted.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require the recording of certificates of sale or redemption of land for taxes.

Source:

L. 1879:

p. 49, §§ 1, 2.

G.S.

§§ 585, 586.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1268, 1269.

C.L.

§§ 8743, 8744.

CSA:

C. 45, §§ 90, 91.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-15.

L. 73:

p. 1156, § 2.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1561, § 11, effective July 1.

30-10-416. Clerk to administer oaths or affirmations - take affidavit or deposition.

The county clerk and recorders of the several counties in the state of Colorado are authorized, within their respective counties, to administer all oaths or affirmations required to be taken by any person upon any lawful occasion, and to take affidavits and depositions concerning any matter or thing, process, or proceeding pending or to be commenced in any court, or any occasion wherein such affidavit or deposition is authorized or required by law to be taken.

Source:

G.L.

§ 425.

G.S.

§ 587.

R.S. 08:

§ 1270.

C.L.

§ 8745.

CSA:

C. 45, § 92.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-16.

L. 64:

p. 382, § 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 697, § 23, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-417. False oaths, perjury.

Oaths and affirmations, affidavits, and depositions administered or taken as provided in section 30-10-416 shall subject any person, who falsely swears or affirms to matters material to any issue or point in question, to the penalties provided by law for persons guilty of perjury in the second degree.

Source:

G.L.

§ 426.

G.S.

§ 588.

R.S. 08:

§ 1271.

C.L.

§ 8746.

CSA:

C. 45, § 93.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-17.

L. 72:

p. 557, § 11.

Cross references:

For perjury in the second degree, see § 18-8-503.

30-10-418. Fees of county clerk and recorder for administering oaths.

For administering oaths and taking affidavits or depositions, as provided in section 30-10-416, county clerk and recorders shall receive the fee prescribed by section 30-1-103 (2)(a).

Source:

G.L.

§ 427.

G.S.

§ 589.

R.S. 08:

§ 1272.

C.L.

§ 8747.

CSA:

C. 45, § 94.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-18.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1226, § 6, effective July 1.

30-10-419. Writs of attachment recorded. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 127, § 105.

Code 08:

§ 116.

CRS 53:

§ 35-4-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-4-19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1226, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1561, § 12, effective July 1.

30-10-420. Maintenance of trade name registration.

Every county clerk and recorder shall maintain trade name registration records provided by the department of revenue.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 984, § 4, effective July 1, 1985.

30-10-421. Filing surcharge - definitions.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Beginning July 1, 2004, and through December 31, 2026, the county clerk and recorder shall collect a surcharge of one dollar for each document received for recording or filing in his or her office. The surcharge shall be in addition to any other fees permitted by statute.

Beginning January 1, 2017, and through April 30, 2026, the county clerk and recorder shall collect the surcharge imposed by the electronic recording technology board under section 24-21-403 (2) for each document received for recording or filing in his or her office. The surcharge is in addition to any other fees permitted by statute.

(1.5) The surcharge described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be collected on any filing received by the county clerk and recorder as an authorized agent of the executive director of the department of revenue pursuant to section 38-29-128 or 42-6-121, C.R.S.

Repealed.

A county clerk and recorder shall transmit monthly each surcharge collected in accordance with paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the electronic recording technology fund created in section 24-21-404, C.R.S. Any money transmitted to the state treasurer is collected on behalf of the electronic recording technology board and is excluded from the county's fiscal year spending.

The county clerk and recorder shall retain the proceeds of the surcharge collected pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section. Such proceeds shall be utilized to defray the costs of establishing, maintaining, improving, or replacing an electronic filing system.

The county clerk and recorder shall place all surcharges that he or she retains pursuant to this subsection (3) in a separate, segregated account.

County governments shall be exempt from all fees authorized to be collected under the provisions of this section if the county or any agency thereof is the grantor or grantee of the document being recorded or if a delegate child support enforcement unit files or records documents for the purpose of collecting child support, child support arrears, maintenance, maintenance when combined with child support, retroactive support, or child support debt.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 748, § 1, effective May 12, 2004.)

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

"Electronic filing system" means the document management system used by the clerk and recorder to comply with the statutory requirements set forth in this part 4 for:

Electronic documents received for recording or filing in his or her office; and

Paper documents received for recording or filing in the clerk and recorder's office that are converted from paper, microfilm, or microfiche into an electronic format.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 791, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1.5) added, p. 966, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), (3), and (5) amended, p. 748, § 1, effective May 12; (1)(b), (2), and (3) amended and (6) added, p. 1157, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) and (3)(b)(II) amended, p. 298, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 11-1313), ch. 226, p. 971, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1) and IP(3)(b) amended and (2) and (3)(a) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1271, § 36, effective May 31.

L. 2016:

(1)(b), (3)(b), and (6) amended, (1)(c) added, and (3)(a) RC&RE, (SB 16-115), ch. 356, p. 1482, § 5, effective June 10.

L. 2021:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 21-1225), ch. 289, p. 1711, § 6, effective September 7.

30-10-422. Clerk and recorder technology fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 792, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, p.1159, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1271, § 37, effective May 31.

30-10-423. Clerk and recorder technology panel - creation - powers - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 792, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(1), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1159, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a)(III) amended, p. 1736, § 26, effective June 6; (5)(a)(II) amended, p. 298, § 2, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2008. (See L. 2004, p.1159.)

30-10-424. Uniform administration - secretary of state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1160, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) and (1)(f)(III) repealed and (1)(g) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1272, § 38, effective May 31.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (SB 16-115), ch. 356, p. 1483, § 6, effective June 10.